Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 4
ENLISTED PERSONS

28-3-401. Enlistment periods - extensions.

Except as otherwise provided in this article or by federal law, original enlistments in the military forces shall be for a period of three years and subsequent enlistments for a period of one or three years. The governor may by order fix shorter periods of enlistment or reenlistment for any of the military forces so far as not inconsistent with federal law. In the event of any emergency wherein the governor has called out any of the military forces, he or she may by order extend, for not exceeding the period of emergency and sixty days thereafter, the period of any enlistment in the forces called out which would otherwise expire.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 618, § 27.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-27.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-27.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 597, § 36, effective May 24.

28-3-402. Enlistment contract - form - oath.

Every person enlisting in the military forces shall sign an enlistment contract in the form prescribed by the adjutant general and shall subscribe to the following oath or affirmation: "I hereby acknowledge to have voluntarily enlisted this ............ day of ............ 20...., in the .................. for the period of three (or one) years, under the conditions prescribed by law, unless sooner discharged by proper authority. And I do solemnly swear that I will bear true faith and allegiance to the United States of America and the state of Colorado; that I will serve them honestly and faithfully against all their enemies whomsoever; and that I will obey the orders of the president of the United States and the governor of the state of Colorado and the officers appointed over me according to law and the rules and articles of war." However, the words "the president of the United States and" shall be omitted in the case of personnel enlisting in forces not subject to federal service.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 618, § 28.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-28.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-28.

28-3-403. Group enlistments barred - when.

No civil association, society, club, post, order, fraternity, brotherhood, union, league, or other organized body shall be enlisted in the military forces as a unit.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 619, § 29.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-29.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-29.

28-3-404. Honorable discharge.

An enlisted person discharged from service in the National Guard shall receive a discharge in writing in such form and with such classification as is prescribed by federal law, and in time of peace discharges may be given prior to the expiration of terms of enlistment under such regulations as the federal authorities may prescribe.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 619, § 30.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-30.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-30.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 597, § 37, effective May 24.

28-3-405. Dishonorable discharge.

A dishonorable discharge from service in the National Guard shall operate as a complete expulsion from the guard, a forfeiture of all exemptions and privileges acquired through membership therein, and disqualification for any military office under the state. The names of all persons dishonorably discharged shall be published in orders by the adjutant general.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 619, § 31.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-31.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-31.

28-3-406. Exemption from arrest or civil process.

No member of the National Guard shall be arrested or served with any summons, order, warrant, or other civil process after having been ordered to any duty or while going to, attending, or returning from any place to which he or she is required to go for military duty; but nothing in this article shall prevent his or her arrest by order of a military officer or for a crime committed while not in actual performance of his or her duty. The articles of military equipment personally owned by such members shall be exempt from seizure or sale for debt pursuant to section 13-54-102, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 619, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-32.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-32.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 587, § 9, effective May 24.

28-3-407. Retired noncommissioned officers - limited assignments.

The commander in chief may assign noncommissioned officers on the retired list to state active duty in recruiting, to serve upon courts-martial, courts of inquiry and board, to staff duty not involving service with troops, to be in charge of a military reservation left temporarily without officers, or to such other duties as the adjutant general may designate. Such noncommissioned officers while so assigned shall receive the full pay and allowances of their grades at time of retirement or may serve in a volunteer unpaid status.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 587, § 10, effective May 24.